Washington statutes.
RCW 43.164.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Business services" means services by local workforce development councils to increase employer engagement in an effort to support industry growth, increase quality employment opportunities for job seekers, and enable persons served by economic security for all grants to access careers with wages that allow them to achieve self-sufficiency.

(2) "Department" means the employment security department.

(3) "People experiencing poverty" means people with a household income that is at or below 200 percent of the federal poverty level.

(4) "People who demonstrate financial need" means people with a household income that is above 200 percent of the federal poverty level but below self-sufficiency who need employment-related services to achieve self-sufficiency.

(5) "Rural counties" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.14.370.

(6) "Self-sufficiency" means a level of household income that is equal to or greater than the self-sufficiency standard for a household as determined by the University of Washington's self-sufficiency calculator.

(7) "Steering committee" means the poverty reduction work group steering committee created in response to a directive of the governor, dated November 6, 2017.

(8) "Workforce development council" means a local workforce development board as established in P.L. 113-128 Sec. 107.

[ 2024 c 92 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2024 c 92: See note following RCW 43.164.020.